California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) It is the public policy of this state that parties to all business transactions, including those transactions which are the subject of this chapter, exhibit mutual financial responsibility with respect to one another. Accordingly, the existence of liens, the concurrence of liens, and the priorities of liens subject to this chapter are determined so as to implement this public policy.

(b) In addition, it is the public policy of this state that all persons engaged in the business of aviation be subject to the highest level of certification by the Federal Aviation Administration of the United States of America (hereafter “the FAA”) available to those persons, and further, that these certificated persons be subject to the highest level of FAA surveillance activities and enforcement proceedings. This certification and surveillance contributes substantially towards the protection of the public by attempting to assure continued and ongoing compliance with all applicable FAA standards and certification criteria. Accordingly, the existence of liens, concurrence of liens, and priorities of liens as set forth in this chapter are determined so as to implement this public policy.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1001, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9793.

No repairperson shall commence work for compensation without specific authorization from the customer or his or her agent, in accordance with all of the following requirements:

(a) The repairperson shall give to the customer either of the following:

(1) A written estimated price for labor and parts for a specific job.

(2) A written estimate of the maximum cost for a specific job that does not differentiate between labor and parts, but which shall not be exceeded by the actual cost of the job, including labor and parts.

No work shall be done or parts supplied in excess of, or different from, the original written estimate without the separate oral or written consent of the customer. If the consent is oral, the repairperson shall make a notation on the work order and on the invoice of the date, time, name of person authorizing the additional work or change in work, and the telephone number called, if any, together with a specification of the additional parts and labor and the total additional cost.

(b) If it is necessary to disassemble a general aviation aircraft or its component in order to prepare a written estimated price for required work, the repairperson shall first give the customer a written estimated price for the disassembly and reassembly. The estimate shall also include the cost of parts and necessary labor to replace items such as gaskets and seals that are normally destroyed by disassembling the component. If the disassembling might prevent the restoration of the component to its former condition, the repairperson shall write that information on the work order containing the estimate before the work order is signed by the customer.

The repairperson shall inform the customer orally, and conspicuously in writing on the work order, of the maximum time it will take the repairperson to reassemble the aircraft or its component if the customer elects not to proceed with the work. The repairperson shall not charge the customer for more time than the specified maximum time if the customer elects not to proceed with the work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9794.

Any repairperson who gives an original estimate in good faith, shall not be obligated to complete a job within the quoted or written estimated price if additional, unforeseen work is necessary to complete the job and the customer refuses to consent to payment for the cost of that additional work.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1001, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9795.

All work done by a repairperson, including all warranty work, shall be recorded on an invoice and shall describe all work done and parts supplied.

Work and parts shall be listed separately on the invoice, which shall also state separately the subtotal prices for work and for parts, not including sales tax, and shall state separately the sales tax, if any, applicable to each.

If any used, rebuilt, or reconditioned parts are supplied, the invoice shall clearly state that fact. If a part of a component system is composed of new and used, rebuilt, or reconditioned parts, the invoice shall clearly state that fact.

One copy of the invoice shall be given to the customer and one copy shall be retained by the repairperson.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1001, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9796.

The invoice shall show the repairperson’s business name and address.

If the repairperson’s telephone number is on the invoice, it shall be the telephone number that appears in any advertisement or on an advertising sign, and shall be the same number as that listed for the repairperson’s firm name and address in the telephone directory, or on the telephone company records if the number is assigned to the repairperson subsequent to the publication of the telephone directory.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1001, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9797.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, upon authorization from the customer as to a specific job, a repairperson may work on an aircraft on a time and materials basis.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1001, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9798.

(a) Sections 9793, 9794, 9795, and 9796 of this chapter shall not apply to services provided to a general aviation aircraft in distress which is in need of immediate work critical to its preservation and safety, for which consent cannot be expeditiously obtained. In all such instances, the work performed shall be done on a time and material basis, notwithstanding the absence of consent by the customer.

(b) In all instances in which the provisions of subdivision (a) are applicable, Sections 9798.1, 9798.2, 9798.3, and 9798.4 shall also be applicable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1001, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9798.1.

(a) Subject to the provisions set forth in this chapter, each repairperson shall have a special lien pursuant to Sections 2872 and 2875 of the Civil Code, upon the civil aircraft, engine, or aircraft appliance upon which the repairperson has bestowed labor or furnished material. The special lien shall be in an amount equal to the agreed upon value of the labor and material furnished, or in the absence of any agreement, for the reasonable value thereof.

(b) The statutory lien created pursuant to subdivision (a) is applicable to any civil aircraft engine, aircraft propeller, or aircraft appliance which is capable of having the ownership, or an interest in the ownership, affected by a conveyance, recorded at the FAA Aircraft Registry.

(c) The statutory lien created pursuant to subdivision (a) is not dependent upon possession by the repairperson of the property which is subject to the lien.

(d) The statutory lien created pursuant to subdivision (a) is dependent upon the recordation of the lien at the FAA Aircraft Registry in accordance with Section 9798.2.

(e) The statutory lien created pursuant to subdivision (a) is created by written contract between the parties but only if the written contract is signed by the customer, and predates the commencement of work for which the lien is applicable.

(f) The statutory lien created pursuant to subdivision (a) is in addition to the statutory lien created pursuant to Section 3051 of the Civil Code if:

(1) The repairperson is a certificated repair station.

(2) The repairperson is a certificated mechanic.

(3) The repairperson is a fixed-base operator.

(g) The statutory lien created pursuant to subdivision (a) is in addition to the statutory lien created pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1208.61) of Title 4 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure if:

(1) The repairperson is a certificated repair station.

(2) The repairperson is a certificated mechanic.

(3) The repairperson is a fixed-base operator.

(h) The statutory lien created pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not exist unless the repairperson has complied with all provisions of Sections 9793, 9794, 9795, 9796, 9797, and 9798.

(i) The statutory lien created pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not exist unless the repairperson complies with either of the following:

(1) The repairperson is insured pursuant to a policy of liability insurance predating the commencement of work for which the lien is applicable, which was applicable and in full force and effect, and contained no policy defenses with respect to the work for which the lien is applicable.

(2) The repairperson is the duly authorized holder of a written surety bond predating the commencement of the work for which the lien is applicable, which obligates the surety to satisfy any and all valid legal claims which may be asserted against the repairperson by the customer in an amount up to and including the value of the property to which the lien applies.

(j) Any statutory lien pursuant to Section 3051 of the Civil Code, and any statutory lien pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1208.61) of Title 4 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and any lien created by the written agreement of the parties pursuant to Section 2884 of the Civil Code, in addition to being dependent upon possession, shall be subject to the applicability of the Commercial Code and “financing statements” as described in Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code may be filed in accordance with the provisions of the Commercial Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1001, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9798.2.

(a) The statutory lien created pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 9798.1 is not valid unless and until it is recorded with the FAA Aircraft Registry in the manner and in the form generally required for the “Recording of Aircraft Titles and Security Documents” pursuant to Part 49 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) In addition to any requirements set forth in Part 49 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the statutory lien created pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 9798.1 is valid upon recordation by the FAA Aircraft Registry of a written document entitled “NOTICE OF LIEN (PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 19.5 OF THE CALIFORNIA BUSINESS AND PROFESSIONS CODE).” This document shall be:

(1) Signed by the repairperson or by a duly authorized agent or attorney of the repairperson.

(2) Verified by the person signing the notice of lien upon that person’s personal knowledge of the matters stated in the notice of lien, and which shall affirmatively state: “Except as to those matters asserted as being upon my information and belief, I declare under penalty of perjury in accordance with the laws of the State of California and of the laws of the United States of America that the matters stated herein are true and correct; and, as to those matters asserted as being upon my information and belief, I declare under penalty of perjury in accordance with the laws of the State of California and of the United States of America that, upon reasonable inquiry, I honestly and genuinely believe these matters to be true as stated.”

(3) Contain the date, time, and place of signing of the notice of lien.

(c) The notice of lien referred to in subdivision (b) shall contain the following information:

(1) The United States Registration Number, make, model, and serial number of the aircraft subject to the lien.

(2) The name of the manufacturer, the model, and the serial number of all applicable engines, propellers, or appliances subject to the lien, to the extent they are not otherwise identifiable merely by reference to the Aircraft Registration Number.

(3) The name, address, and business telephone number of the repairperson asserting the lien.

(4) The name, address, and business telephone number of the registered owner of the civil aircraft or other property subject to the lien.

(5) The name, address, and business telephone number of the person consenting to the performance of the work giving rise to the lien.

(6) The amount of the lien, exclusive of prospective storage costs.

(7) A narrative statement describing the nature of the work accomplished.

(8) The affirmative statement that a copy of the notice of lien is concurrently being sent by United States mail, certified, return receipt requested with postage fully prepaid thereon, or by other comparable or more expeditious delivery services, to both the registered owner and to the person consenting to the work.

(9) The date of last services or materials provided.

(d) No notice of lien pursuant to subdivision (b) is valid unless it is presented for recording at the FAA Registry within 180 days of the completion of the work giving rise to the lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1001, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9798.3.

(a) Any repairperson having perfected his or her statutory lien pursuant to Section 9798.2 shall be entitled to the ex parte issuance of an order to show cause why the aircraft or other property should not be sold at auction. The order to show cause shall be issued by the Superior Court of the State of California upon the filing in the superior court of a verified application for ex parte order to show cause why the aircraft or other property should not be sold at auction, which sets forth a true copy of the notice of lien described in Section 9798.2. The order to show cause shall set a hearing date not less than 20 days after the date of the order, upon which the customer, the registered owner, or any other person having an interest therein may present evidence to the court, by way of declarations under penalty of perjury, or oral testimony as may be authorized by the court, as to any reason why the aircraft or other property subject to the lien should not be sold at auction in accordance with the provisions pertaining to the enforcement of judgments generally within this state.

(b) The order to show cause shall be personally served upon the registered owner, the customer, and any other person then known to the repairperson to have an interest in the aircraft or other property subject to the lien within five days of the date of issuance of the order to show cause; and concurrent with all attempts to obtain personal service, a copy of the order to show cause shall be sent by United States mail, certified, return receipts requested, to each customer, the registered owner, and any other person or entity then known to the repair person to have an interest in the aircraft or other property subject to the lien or any other person who has registered a lien upon, conveyance of, or other interest in, the aircraft or other property subject to the lien with the FAA Aircraft Registry.

(c) At the hearing, the court shall have in rem jurisdiction with respect to the aircraft or other property subject to the lien, and shall have personal jurisdiction over all persons or entities appearing at the hearing, and may make orders and enter judgments in accordance with applicable law.

(d) The registered owner or customer of the aircraft or other property subject to the lien shall have a right of redemption in the full amount of all amounts due to the repairperson, to be paid in cash, or in the equivalent, to the repairperson at any time up to, but not including, the entering of any judgment affecting the title to the aircraft or other property subject to the lien.

(e) Any judgment entered by the court shall be deemed to be a “conveyance” within the meaning of subdivision (17) of Section 1301 of Title 49 of the United States Code, and shall be recordable at the FAA Aircraft Registry pursuant to Section 49.17 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(f) Upon payment to the repairperson by or on behalf of the registered owner of the aircraft or other property subject to the lien, or by the customer, the repairperson shall cause to be filed with the FAA Aircraft Registry a notice of cancellation of lien. The filing of the notice of cancellation of lien shall terminate all interest of the repairperson that was otherwise subject to the notice of lien.

(g) In any action for the enforcement of the statutory lien provided by this chapter, the prevailing party or parties shall be entitled to recover from the nonprevailing party or parties such costs of suit and attorney fees as may be deemed by the court, in its discretion, to be just and reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1001, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9798.4.

(a) The priority of liens set forth in this section supersedes the priority otherwise set forth in Section 2897 of the Civil Code.

(b) The time of creation of the lien shall be the time that the FAA Aircraft Registry actually records the notice of lien described in Section 9798.2.

(c) With respect to the subcategory of “repairpersons” as described in Section 9790, as between lien claimants of equal subcategory, different liens upon the same property have priority according to the time of their creation.

(d) With respect to the subcategories of “repairperson” as described in Section 9790 as between different liens upon the same property which are created within 30 days of one another:

(1) The lien of a certificated repair station has priority over the liens of all other repairpersons.

(2) The lien of a certificated mechanic has priority over the liens of all other repairpersons other than certificated repair stations.

(3) The liens of a fixed-base operator have priority over all other repairpersons other than certificated repair stations and certificated mechanics.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1001, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 20. Electronic and Appliance Repair Dealers [9800. - 9874.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [9800. - 9807.]

9800.

This chapter of the Business and Professions Code constitutes the chapter on electronic and appliance repair dealers. It may be cited as the Electronic and Appliance Repair Dealer Registration Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1288.)
-------------------------------------------

9801.

The following terms as used in this chapter have the meaning expressed in this section:

(a) “Person” includes a firm, partnership, association, limited liability company, or corporation.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(c) “Director” means the Director of Consumer Affairs.

(d) “Bureau” means the Bureau of Household Goods and Services.

(e) “Chief” means the Chief of the Bureau of Household Goods and Services.

(f) “Service dealer” means a person who, for compensation, engages in, or holds themselves out to the public as offering services in the business of:

(1) Repairing, servicing, or maintaining an electronic set normally used or sold for personal, family, household, or home office use.

(2) Installing, repairing, servicing, or maintaining equipment or a burglar alarm system for use in private motor vehicles.

(3) Installing, repairing, servicing, or maintaining television or radio receiver antennas, rotators, and accessories or direct satellite signal receiving equipment located on or adjacent to a residence and not involving a function that is subject to and
 regulated under the provisions of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000).

(4) Repairing, servicing, or maintaining major appliances.

(g) “Equipment” for the purposes of this chapter means an electronic set, appliance, antenna, rotator, and accessories.

(h) “Electronic set” includes, but is not limited to, any television, radio, audio or video recorder or playback equipment, video camera, video game, video monitor, computer system, cellular device, such as a telephone or tablet, photocopier, facsimile machine, or any other device that depends for its functioning, in whole or in part, on any digital electronic embedded or attached to the product and has a value over ten dollars ($10) and is normally used or sold for
 personal, family, household, or home office use.

(i) “Appliance” or “major home appliance” means any device primarily used for residential purposes, including, but
 not limited to, any refrigerator, freezer, range, microwave oven, washer, dryer, dishwasher, trash compactor, ice maker, dehumidifier, residential portable furnace, or room air-conditioner normally used or sold for personal, family, household, or home office use, or for use in private motor vehicles.

(j) “Antenna” includes, but is not limited to, a resonant device designed especially for the purpose of capturing electromagnetic energy transmitted by direct satellite or commercial radio or television broadcasting facilities. An antenna and its associated accessories are not deemed to be a part of a set and shall be considered, under this section, to be located outside or in the attic of a residence.

(k) “Rotator,” when used in connection with an antenna
 installation or repair, includes, but is not limited to, an electromechanical device operated from a remote location to rotate an antenna on a horizontal plane. A rotator and its associated accessories are not deemed to be a part of a set and shall be considered under this section, with the exception of the directional control unit, to be located outside or in the attic of a residence.

(l) “Accessories,” when used in connection with an antenna or rotator installation or repair, includes, but is not limited to, masts, towers, clamps, guy wires, eye hooks, standoff insulators, roof saddles, vent pipe mounts, chimney mount kits, signal amplifiers/boosters, multiset couplers, transmission lines, control cables, directional control units, and other devices as may be used from time to time to effect installation or repair.

(m) “Computer system” includes, but is not limited to, a central
 processing unit that performs data manipulation functions, and any associated peripheral devices, including, but not limited to, keyboards, display terminals, printers, or disk drives.

(n) “Video game” includes, but is not limited to, any electronic amusement device that utilizes a computer, microprocessor, or similar electronic circuitry.

(o) “Direct satellite signal receiving equipment” includes, but is not limited to, receivers, down converters, amplifiers, and audio or video processors related to the reception of audio, video, or data signals broadcasted or rebroadcasted by communication satellites located in space.

(p) “Electronic repair industry” means those activities defined in paragraph
 (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (f).

(q) “Appliance repair industry” means those activities defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 3.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9802.

This chapter does not apply to:

(a) Any employee of a service dealer while the employee is engaged in activities within the normal scope of the employer’s business.

(b) The repair, service, or maintenance of equipment used in commercial, nonresidential, industrial, or governmental establishments.

(c) The repair, services, or maintenance of equipment the ordinary and usual use of which requires a license or permit issued by the Federal Communications Commission.

(d) Any person
 licensed under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) as an electrical contractor (C-10) or a low-voltage communications systems contractor (C-7) and acting within the scope of their license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 188, Sec. 14.   (SB 826)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9804.

No person who is licensed pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of this code shall be required to register under this chapter if such person’s activities are within the scope of his license; nor shall such person be prohibited from repairing, servicing, or maintaining equipment of any type, the installation of which may be performed under his license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1492.)
-------------------------------------------

9805.

No person registered under this chapter shall be required to apply for a license pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) if that person’s activities consist only of (a) installing satellite antenna systems on residential structures or property, or (b) installing, repairing, servicing, or maintaining televisions, or an electronic set normally used or sold for personal, family, household, or home office use, or any appliances, and that installation, repair, service, or maintenance is not subject to and regulated under Chapter 9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1264, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9806.

(a) An automobile dealer or manufacturer, licensed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11700) of Division 5 of the Vehicle Code shall not be required to be registered under this chapter where such dealer or manufacturer installs or replaces an electronic set or automobile burglar alarm as a function related to the sale or repair of a motor vehicle.

(b) No person registered pursuant to Chapter 20.3 (commencing with Section 9880) shall be required to register under this chapter where that person’s activities are within the scope of his or her registration and consist of installing an electronic set or automobile burglar alarm system for use in private motor vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1264, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9807.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a service dealer licensed under this chapter and authorized to engage in the electronic repair industry, as defined in subdivision (p) of Section 9801, may install, calibrate, service, maintain, and monitor certified ignition interlock devices.

(b) (1) The director may issue a citation to, or suspend, revoke, or place on probation the registration of, a service dealer who installs, calibrates, services, maintains, or monitors ignition interlock devices if the service dealer is not in compliance with subdivision (k) of Section 23575.3 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) A service dealer shall provide to an individual
 receiving ignition interlock device services the information provided in subdivision (k) of Section 23575.3 of the Vehicle Code along with the contact telephone number of the bureau. 

(c) The bureau shall adopt regulations to implement this section consistent with the standards adopted by the Bureau of Automotive Repair and the Office of Traffic Safety under Section 9882.14.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 783, Sec. 1.   (SB 1046)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [9810. - 9814.5.]

9810.

(a) (1) There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs a Bureau of Household Goods and Services, under the supervision and control of the director. The director shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 19000) and Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 19225) of Division 8.

(2) There is a Division of Household Movers within the bureau for purposes of administering Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 19225) of Division 8. The Division of Household Movers shall be overseen by the chief of the bureau.

(b) The Governor shall appoint, subject to
 confirmation by the Senate, a chief of the bureau at a salary to be fixed and determined by the director with the approval of the Director of Finance. The chief shall serve under the direction and supervision of the director and at the pleasure of the Governor.

(c) Every power granted to or duty imposed upon the director under this chapter and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 19000) and Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 19225) of Division 8 may be exercised or performed in the name of the director by a deputy or assistant director or by the chief, subject to conditions and limitations that the director may prescribe.

(d) Whenever the laws of this state refer to the Bureau of Electronic Repair Dealer Registration or the Bureau of Electronic and Appliance Repair, the
 reference shall be construed to be to the Bureau of Household Goods and Services.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, the powers and duties of the Bureau of Household Goods and Services, as set forth in this chapter and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 19000) and Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 19225) of Division 8, shall be subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. The review shall be performed as if this chapter and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 19000) and Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 19225) of Division 8 were scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 4.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9810.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Bureau of Household Goods and Services in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions under this chapter. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 578, Sec. 5.   (SB 1483)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9811.

The director, in accordance with the State Civil Service Act and Section 159.5, may appoint and fix the compensation of such clerical, inspection, investigation, and auditing personnel as well as a deputy chief, as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. All such personnel shall perform their respective duties under the supervision and the direction of the chief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1264, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9812.

The director shall gather evidence of violations of this chapter and of any regulation established hereunder, by any service dealer, whether registered or not, and by any employee, partner, officer, or member of any service dealer. The director shall, on their own initiative, conduct spot check investigations of service dealers throughout the state on a continuous basis, but no less than twice per year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 5.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9812.5.

The director shall gather evidence of violations of this chapter and of any regulation established hereunder by any service contractor, whether registered or not, and by any employee, partner, officer, or member of any service contractor. The director shall, on their own initiative, conduct spot check investigations of service contractors throughout the state on a continuous basis.

This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 6.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9813.

The director shall have the powers granted to the head of a department by, and shall conform to the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1492.)
-------------------------------------------

9814.

The director may establish and enforce regulations as may be reasonable for the conduct of service dealers and for the general enforcement of the various provisions of this chapter in the protection of the public. The director may, by regulation, define the scope of the terms described in subdivisions (g) to (q), inclusive, of Section 9801 to include items of the same general nature or class as those enumerated therein. The director shall either make available on its internet website or distribute to each registered service dealer copies of this chapter and of the regulations thereunder. These regulations shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340)
 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 7.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9814.5.

The director may establish and enforce reasonable regulations for the conduct of service contractors, and for the general enforcement of the various provisions of this chapter in the protection of the public. The director shall either make available on its internet website or distribute to each registered service contractor copies of this chapter and of the regulations adopted under this chapter. Regulations shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 8.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Registration Procedure [9830. - 9833.]

9830.

Each service dealer shall pay the fee required by this chapter for each place of business and each drop-off location, as defined by bureau regulations, operated by him or her in this state and shall register with the bureau upon forms prescribed by the director. The forms shall contain sufficient information to identify the service dealer, including name, address, retail seller’s permit number, if a permit is required under the Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code), a copy of the certificate of qualification as filed with the Secretary of State if the service dealer is a foreign corporation, and other identifying data to be prescribed by the bureau. If the business is to be carried on under a fictitious name, that fictitious name shall be stated. If the service dealer is a partnership, identifying data shall be stated for each partner. If the service dealer is a private company that does not file an annual report on Form 10-K with the Securities and Exchange Commission, data shall be included for each of the officers and directors of the company as well as for the individual in charge of each place of the service dealer’s business in the State of California, subject to any regulations the director may adopt. If the service dealer is a publicly held corporation or a private company that files an annual report on Form 10-K with the Securities and Exchange Commission, it shall be sufficient for purposes of providing data for each of the officers and directors of the corporation or company to file with the director the most recent annual report on Form 10-K that is filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.

A service dealer who does not operate a place of business in this state, but who engages in the electronic repair industry or the appliance repair industry in this state, shall hold a valid registration issued by the bureau and shall pay the registration fee required by this chapter as if he or she had a place of business in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1275, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

9830.5.

(a) Each service contractor shall pay the fee required by this chapter for each place of business operated by them in this state and shall register with the bureau upon forms prescribed by the director. The forms shall contain sufficient information to identify the service contractor, including name, address, retail seller’s permit number, if a permit is required under the Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code), a copy of the certificate of qualification as filed with the Secretary of State if the service contractor is a foreign corporation, and other identifying data to be prescribed by the bureau. If the business is to be carried on under a fictitious name, that fictitious
 name shall be stated. If the service contractor is a partnership, identifying data shall be stated for each partner. If the service contractor is a private company that does not file an annual report on Form 10-K with the Securities and Exchange Commission, data shall be included for each of the officers and directors of the company as well as for the individual in charge of each place of the service contractor’s business in the State of California, subject to any regulations the director may adopt. If the service contractor is a publicly held corporation or a private company that files an annual report on Form 10-K with the Securities and Exchange Commission, it shall be sufficient for purposes of providing data for each of the officers and directors of the corporation or company to file with the director the most recent annual report on Form 10-K that is filed with the Securities and Exchange
 Commission.

(b) A service contractor who does not operate a place of business in this state but who sells, issues, or administers service contracts in this state, shall hold a valid registration issued by the bureau and shall pay the registration fee required by this chapter as if they had a place of business in this state.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 9.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9831.

Upon receipt of the form properly filled out and receipt of the required fee, the director shall, provided the applicant has not committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480, issue the registration and send a proof of issuance to the service dealer. The director shall by regulation prescribe conditions upon which a person whose registration has previously been revoked or has previously been denied, may have his or her registration issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

9832.

(a) Registrations issued under this chapter shall expire no more than 12 months after the issue date. The expiration date of registrations shall be set by the director in a manner to best distribute renewal procedures throughout the year.

(b) To renew an unexpired registration, the service dealer shall, on or before the expiration date of the registration, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the director, and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter.

(c) To renew an expired registration, the service dealer shall apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the director, pay the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date, and pay all accrued and unpaid delinquency and renewal fees.

(d) Renewal is effective on the date that the application is filed, the renewal fee is paid, and all delinquency fees are paid.
